Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 2. Fees and Exemptions

§ 361.
Pleasure cars.

The annual fee for registration of any motor vehicle of the pleasure car type, and all vehicles powered by electricity, shall be $74.00, and the biennial fee shall be $136.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 286

, § 1;

1981, No. 87

, § 6;

1989, No. 51

, § 16;

1993, No. 27

, § 8;

1995, No. 49

, § 2, eff. April 20, 1995;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. May 15, 2002;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 30;

2009, No. 50

, § 41;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 362.
Specialized fuel motor vehicles and motor buses.

The annual fee for the registration of any “specialized fuel driven motor vehicle” as defined in section 4 of this title and of motor buses as defined in section 3002 of this title shall be one and three-quarters times the amount of the annual fee provided for a motor vehicle of the classification and weight under the terms of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1993, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2007, No. 75

, § 33.

§ 363.
Converted motor vehicle.

When a motor vehicle of the pleasure car type is built over or converted into a motor vehicle designed for carrying merchandise or freight, such motor vehicle shall be registered at the pleasure car rate or at the truck rate as the Commissioner may, in the Commissioner’s discretion, determine.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 231.

§ 364.
Motorcycles.

The annual fee for registration of a motorcycle, with or without sidecar, shall be $46.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 87

, § 7;

1989, No. 51

, § 17;

1989, No. 268

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 21, 1990;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. May 15, 2002;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 31;

2009, No. 50

, § 42;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 16.

§ 364a.
Motor-driven cycles: registration; financial responsibility.

The annual fee for registration of a motor-driven cycle shall be $28.00.

Motor-driven cycle operators shall be subject to the provisions of section 801 of this title, which requires, in certain cases, that proof of financial responsibility be filed with the Commissioner after a crash.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 20

, § 9; amended

1981, No. 87

, § 8;

1989, No. 51

, § 18;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 15, 2002;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 19b, eff. Sept. 1, 2010;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 17.

§ 364b.
All-surface vehicles; registration.

The annual fee for registration of an all-surface vehicle (ASV) shall be the sum of the fees established by sections 3305 and 3504 of this title, plus $26.00.

Evidence of the registration shall be a sticker, as determined by the Commissioner, affixed to the plate issued pursuant to chapter 31 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 365.
Hearse or ambulance.

The annual fee for registration of a hearse or ambulance, except ambulances owned by a municipality and used for police patrol purposes, shall be based on the pleasure car rate.

§ 366.
Repealed. 2015, No. 158 (Adj. Sess.), § 78(1).

§ 367.
Trucks.

The annual fee for registration of tractors, truck-tractors, or motor trucks except truck cranes, truck shovels, road oilers, bituminous distributors, and farm trucks used as specified in subsection (f) of this section shall be based on the total weight of the truck-tractor or motor truck, including body and cab plus the heaviest load to be carried. In computing the fees for registration of tractors, truck-tractors, or motor trucks with trailers or semi-trailers attached, except trailers or semi-trailers with a gross weight of less than 6,000 pounds, the fee shall be based upon the weight of the tractor, truck-tractor, or motor truck, the weight of the trailer or semi-trailer, and the weight of the heaviest load to be carried by the combined vehicles. In addition to the fee set out in the following schedule, the fee for vehicles weighing between 10,000 and 25,999 pounds inclusive shall be an additional $35.50, the fee for vehicles weighing between 26,000 and 39,999 pounds inclusive shall be an additional $70.98, the fee for vehicles weighing between 40,000 and 59,999 pounds inclusive shall be an additional $248.48, and the fee for vehicles 60,000 pounds and over shall be an additional $390.48. The fee shall be computed at the following rates per 1,000 pounds of weight determined pursuant to this subdivision and rounded up to the nearest whole dollar; the minimum fee for registering a tractor, truck-tractor, or motor truck to 6,000 pounds shall be the same as for the pleasure car type:
(a) (1) The annual fee for registration of tractors, truck-tractors, or motor trucks except truck cranes, truck shovels, road oilers, bituminous distributors, and farm trucks used as specified in subsection (f) of this section shall be based on the total weight of the truck-tractor or motor truck, including body and cab plus the heaviest load to be carried. In computing the fees for registration of tractors, truck-tractors, or motor trucks with trailers or semi-trailers attached, except trailers or semi-trailers with a gross weight of less than 6,000 pounds, the fee shall be based upon the weight of the tractor, truck-tractor, or motor truck, the weight of the trailer or semi-trailer, and the weight of the heaviest load to be carried by the combined vehicles. In addition to the fee set out in the following schedule, the fee for vehicles weighing between 10,000 and 25,999 pounds inclusive shall be an additional $35.50, the fee for vehicles weighing between 26,000 and 39,999 pounds inclusive shall be an additional $70.98, the fee for vehicles weighing between 40,000 and 59,999 pounds inclusive shall be an additional $248.48, and the fee for vehicles 60,000 pounds and over shall be an additional $390.48. The fee shall be computed at the following rates per 1,000 pounds of weight determined pursuant to this subdivision and rounded up to the nearest whole dollar; the minimum fee for registering a tractor, truck-tractor, or motor truck to 6,000 pounds shall be the same as for the pleasure car type:

Fractions of 1,000 pounds shall be computed at the next highest 1,000 pounds, excepting, however, fractions of hundredweight shall be disregarded.

$15.20 when the weight exceeds 6,000 pounds but does not exceed 8,000 pounds.

$17.39 when the weight exceeds 8,000 pounds but does not exceed 12,000 pounds.

$19.17 when the weight exceeds 12,000 pounds but does not exceed 16,000 pounds.

$20.50 when the weight exceeds 16,000 pounds but does not exceed 20,000 pounds.

$21.46 when the weight exceeds 20,000 pounds but does not exceed 30,000 pounds.

$21.92 when the weight exceeds 30,000 pounds but does not exceed 40,000 pounds.

$22.45 when the weight exceeds 40,000 pounds but does not exceed 50,000 pounds.

$22.65 when the weight exceeds 50,000 pounds but does not exceed 60,000 pounds.

$23.42 when the weight exceeds 60,000 pounds but does not exceed 70,000 pounds.

$24.21 when the weight exceeds 70,000 pounds but does not exceed 80,000 pounds.

$24.99 when the weight exceeds 80,000 pounds but does not exceed 90,000 pounds.

The annual fee for registration of a category I special purpose vehicle shall be $178.00, and the annual fee for a category II special purpose vehicle shall be $415.00.

-(e) [Repealed.]

(f) (1)

The annual fee for registration of a farm truck of a total weight, determined as provided in subsection (a) of this section, used only for the transportation of agricultural products produced on, and material to be used in connection with the operation of, a farm or farms owned, operated, or occupied by the registrant, or motor trucks that are agricultural custom service vehicles as defined in subdivision 4(70) of this title, shall be $40.00 if the total weight is less than 18,000 pounds. If the gross weight is at least 18,000 pounds but is less than 35,000 pounds, the fee shall be $61.00. If the gross weight is at least 35,000 pounds but does not exceed 60,000 pounds, the fee shall be $115.00. If the gross weight exceeds 60,000 pounds but does not exceed 80,000 pounds, the fee shall be $182.50.

(2)

In the event that a farm truck or agricultural custom service vehicle so registered is thereafter registered for general use during the same registration year, the fee or a pro rata portion thereof shall be applied toward the fee for general registration. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to licensed cattle and poultry dealers.

(g)

[Repealed.]

(h)

Loader backhoes used primarily for agricultural related purposes are exempt from the provisions of this section.

(i)

The annual fee for registration of a truck used for logging shall be determined pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.
Trucks used for logging shall be those motor vehicles used exclusively for the transportation of harvested forest products from a forested site.

(j)

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 286

, § 2, eff. Aug. 1, 1961;

1963, No. 223

, § 3;

1964, No. 19

(Sp. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 9, 1964;

1965, No. 120

, § 1;

1973, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 15, 1974;

1977, No. 29

, eff. April 1, 1977;

1979, No. 46

, § 1, eff. April 26, 1979;

1979, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), eff. May 6, 1980;

1981, No. 87

, § 10;

1981, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1983, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.);

1983, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1985, No. 85

, § 10;

1985, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 18, 1986;

1987, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 13, 1988;

1989, No. 51

, § 20;

1995, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 25, 1996;

2001, No. 69

, § 10, eff. Jan. 1, 2002;

2001, No. 75

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2001, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 15, 2002;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 32, 41;

2009, No. 50

, § 43;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 146;

2021, No. 20

, § 232.

§ 367a.
Special purpose truck plates; penalties.

The misuse of a vehicle registered under the provisions of a special purpose truck plate under the provisions of section 367 of this title shall be a traffic violation as defined in section 2302 of this title and shall be punishable by a civil penalty of $100.00 for a first offense and by a civil penalty of $200.00 for a second offense occurring within 12 months. Upon a conviction for a second offense, the owner shall be required to register the vehicle at the same rate as provided in subsection 367(a) of this title for other commercial trucks.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 25, 1996; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 147.

§ 367b.
Use of wreckers.

A motor truck that is registered as a wrecker may tow a motor vehicle on the highway without the towed vehicle being required to be registered.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 20

, § 3.

§ 368.
Misuse of farm registration.

A person shall not operate or move upon a highway a motor truck registered as a farm truck:

with a gross weight, including load and vehicle, exceeding the weight for which it is registered under section 367 of this title; or

for any purpose other than the transportation of agricultural products produced on, or materials to be used in connection with the operation of, a farm.

Any truck operated or moved in violation of this statute shall be required to be registered as a commercial truck and any person in violation of this section shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $175.00 for each offense.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1993, No. 65

, § 2;

2001, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 148.

§ 369.
Tractors other than farm tractors.

The annual fee for registration of a tractor, except farm tractors as otherwise provided in this chapter, shall be based on the actual weight of such tractor at the same rate as that provided for trucks of like weight under the provisions of this chapter. The minimum fee for registering any tractor shall be $20.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1964, No. 19

(Sp. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 9, 1964;

1975, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 1, 1976;

1981, No. 87

, § 11;

1989, No. 51

, § 21;

2001, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 79.

§ 370.
Farm trucks, tractors, and trailers.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law relating to registration fees for motor vehicles or trailers, farm tractors and farm trailers may be operated on the highway without being subject to a registration fee.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not be construed to prevent unregistered farm trucks that are not “agricultural custom service vehicles” as defined in subdivision 4(70) of this title when being used exclusively for farm work:

from being moved upon a highway within the confines of the farm; or

from being moved upon highways from one farm to another.

Subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not be construed to prevent the:

operation of an unregistered tractor hired by a municipal corporation in the upkeep and maintenance of the highways; or

operation of a tractor for plowing or removing snow from such highway within such corporation.

All farm trucks, other than those provided for in subsection (b) of this section, shall be subject to the registration requirements of subsection 367(f) of this title and shall be exempt from the permit requirements of sections 1400 and 1400a of this title, provided the gross weight of the farm truck does not exceed 60,000 pounds and the vehicle is in compliance with the provisions of subsection 1391(a) of this title.

A farm tractor or a farm trailer shall be exempt from the permit requirements of sections 1400 and 1400a of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 1, 1976;

2001, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 371.
Trailer and semi-trailer.

The one-year and two-year fees for registration of a trailer or semi-trailer, except a contractor’s trailer or farm trailer, shall be as follows:
(a) (1) The one-year and two-year fees for registration of a trailer or semi-trailer, except a contractor’s trailer or farm trailer, shall be as follows:

$27.00 and $51.00, respectively, when such trailer or semi-trailer has a gross weight of trailer and load of 1,500 pounds or less;

$52.00 and $102.00, respectively, when such trailer or semi-trailer has a gross weight of trailer and load of more than 1,500 pounds and is drawn by a vehicle of the pleasure car type;

$52.00 and $102.00, respectively, when such trailer or semi-trailer is drawn by a motor truck or tractor, when such trailer or semi-trailer has a gross weight of more than 1,500 pounds but less than 3,000 pounds;

$52.00 and $102.00, respectively, when such trailer or semi-trailer is used in combination with a truck-tractor or motor truck registered at the fee provided for combined vehicles under section 367 of this title. Excepting for the fees, the provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to trailer coaches as defined in section 4 of this title nor to modular homes being transported by trailer or semi-trailer.

The one-year and two-year fees for registration of a contractor’s trailer shall be $197.00 and $394.00, respectively.

A trailer or semi-trailer, except a farm trailer, may be registered for a period of five years for a fee equal to five times the annual fee established by subsection (a) of this section.
(b) (1) A trailer or semi-trailer, except a farm trailer, may be registered for a period of five years for a fee equal to five times the annual fee established by subsection (a) of this section.

Any registration made for a period of five years shall cost the full fee regardless of the month in which the registration is made, but a five-year registration may be transferred or cancelled in the same manner as an annual registration.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 223

, § 4;

1964, No. 19

(Sp. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 9, 1964;

1967, No. 37

, § 1;

1975, No. 90

, § 4;

1981, No. 87

, § 12;

1983, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1989, No. 51

, § 22;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. May 15, 2002;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 33;

2009, No. 50

, § 44;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2013, No. 57

, § 6;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 371a.
Exemptions from registration.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law relating to registration fees for trailers, the following shall be exempt from registration:

wood splitters; and

pole dinkeys.

When any such trailer is used upon a public highway it shall have attached a red reflector that shall be so displayed as to be clearly visible from the rear, under normal atmospheric conditions, or a reflectorized slow moving vehicle symbol of a standard type approved by the Commissioner.

A person in violation of this section shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $25.00 for each offense.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 72

; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 149.

§ 372.
Motor bus.

The annual fee for registration of a motor bus shall be based on the actual weight of such bus, plus passenger carrying capacity at 150 pounds per person, and shall be $2.00 per 100 pounds of such weight, except for motor buses registered under section 372a or 376 of this title. Fractions of a hundred-weight shall be disregarded. The minimum fee for the registration of any motor bus shall be $43.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 87

, § 13;

1989, No. 51

, § 23;

2009, No. 50

, § 74;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 21.

§ 372a.
Local transit public transportation service.

The annual registration fee for any motor bus used in local transit or public transportation service shall be $62.00, except for those vehicles owned by a municipality for such service that are subject to the provisions of section 376 of this title. In the event a bus registered for local transit or public transportation service is subsequently registered for general use during the same registration year, such fee shall be applied toward the fee for general registration.

As used in this section, a motor bus used in public transportation service is a motor bus used by a nonprofit public transit system as defined in

24 V.S.A. § 5088(3)

, and a motor bus used in local transit is a motor bus used entirely within or not more than 100 miles beyond the boundaries of a city or town.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 51

, § 24;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. May 15, 2002;

2009, No. 50

, § 75;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2017, No. 71

, § 7;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 152;

2021, No. 20

, § 233.

§ 373.
Exhibition vehicles; year of manufacture plates.

The annual fee for the registration of a motor vehicle that is maintained for use in exhibitions, club activities, parades, and other functions of public interest and that is not used for general daily transportation of passengers or property on any highway shall be $21.00, in lieu of fees otherwise provided by law. Permitted use shall include:

use in exhibitions, club activities, parades, and other functions of public interest; and

occasional transportation of passengers or property not more than one day per week.

Pursuant to the provisions of section 304 of this title, one registration plate shall be issued to those vehicles registered under subsection (a) of this section.

Vermont registration plates issued prior to 1968 may be displayed on a motor vehicle registered under this section instead of the plate issued under this section, if the issued plate is maintained within the vehicle and produced upon request of any enforcement officer as defined in subdivision 4(11) of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 87

, § 14;

1989, No. 51

, § 25;

1989, No. 82

, § 2;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. May 15, 2002;

2009, No. 50

, § 96;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 60;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2017, No. 71

, § 8.

§ 374.
Jitney.

The annual fee for registration of a jitney designed to carry not more than seven persons, including the operator, shall be the same as is required for the registration of a motor vehicle of the pleasure car type.
When a jitney is designed to carry more than seven passengers, including the operator, the fee shall be the same as is required for the registration of a motor bus of like passenger carrying capacity.

§ 375.
Repealed.
1971, No. 150 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1973.

§ 376.
State, municipal, fire department, and rescue organization motor vehicles.

A fee shall not be charged for registration of motor vehicles owned by the State.

The fee for registration of a motor vehicle owned by any municipality in this State and used entirely by it or any other municipality for municipal purposes shall be $12.00 in lieu of fees otherwise specified in this chapter. As used in this subsection, the term municipality shall include county-owned vehicles. The Commissioner shall issue specially designed registration plates for county-owned sheriffs’ departments’ vehicles.

The registration fee for registration of a motor truck, trailer, ambulance, or other motor vehicle, owned by a volunteer fire department or other volunteer fire fighting organization or other organization conducting rescue operations and used solely for fire fighting or rescue purposes shall be $12.00 in lieu of fees otherwise specified in this chapter. A motor vehicle or trailer registered under this section shall be plainly marked on both sides of the body or cab to indicate its ownership.

The use of a school bus owned by a municipality in this State, whether or not that use is compensated, shall be considered a municipal purpose within the meaning of this section.

[Repealed.]

A replacement registration plate shall be provided by the Commissioner upon the payment of a fee of $9.00.

The fee for registration of a motor vehicle obtained from the government as excess government property, or a vehicle purchased with 100 percent federal funds and used for federally supported local programs, shall be $14.00, in lieu of fees otherwise specified in this chapter. The Commissioner shall determine the eligibility as to whether or not the motor vehicle qualifies for this registration and ownership of the vehicle shall be plainly marked on both sides of the body or cab.
(g) (1) The fee for registration of a motor vehicle obtained from the government as excess government property, or a vehicle purchased with 100 percent federal funds and used for federally supported local programs, shall be $14.00, in lieu of fees otherwise specified in this chapter. The Commissioner shall determine the eligibility as to whether or not the motor vehicle qualifies for this registration and ownership of the vehicle shall be plainly marked on both sides of the body or cab.

The registration of a vehicle used for other than federally supported local programs shall be revoked.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 50

, eff. April 1, 1962;

1963, No. 190

;

1967, No. 129

, § 10;

1971, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1973;

1975, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1977, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 19, 1978;

1979, No. 42

;

1979, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1981, No. 87

, § 15;

1989, No. 51

, § 26;

1989, No. 82

, § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1990;

1997, No. 39

, § 6;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 377.
Government-owned vehicles.

The Commissioner shall have authority to issue registration certificates and registration number plates without charge to passenger car vehicles, not otherwise required to be registered under the provisions of this title, owned by the U.S. government, other states, or provinces.

HISTORY:

Amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 150.

§ 378.
Veterans’ exemptions.

No fees shall be charged an honorably discharged veteran of the U.S. Armed Forces who is a resident of the State of Vermont for the registration of a motor vehicle that the veteran has acquired with financial assistance from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, or for the registration of a motor vehicle owned by him or her during his or her lifetime obtained as a replacement thereof, when his or her application is accompanied by a copy of an approved VA Form 21-4502 issued by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs certifying him or her to be entitled to the financial assistance.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 38

, § 1;

2017, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§§ 379,
380.
Repealed.
1979, No. 34, § 4, eff. Nov. 1, 1979.

§ 381.
Fees turned over to State Treasurer.

Except as otherwise provided, all fees for registering motor vehicles, licensing operators, and all other motor vehicle fees shall be collected by the Commissioner and forthwith paid into the State Treasury or deposited to such bank to the credit of the State Treasurer as he or she may direct.

-(d) [Repealed.]

(e)

Whenever a payment is received that is less than, but within $0.99 of, the required fee, the transaction shall be processed. The Commissioner may determine that action will not be taken to collect the missing portion of the fee. When a payment up to $1.00 greater than the required fee is received, the excess shall not be refunded.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 89

, § 309;

1987, No. 241

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

1991, No. 89

;

1997, No. 61

, § 240;

2011, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 382.
Diesel-powered pleasure cars.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the annual registration fee for a pleasure car or tractor, truck-tractor, or motor truck up to 6,000 pounds powered by fuel as defined in section 3002 of this title shall be $74.00, and the biennial fee shall be $136.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 10; amended

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 25.